Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2304
Nebraska state-chartered trust company; out-of-state representative trust offices; authorized.

A Nebraska state-chartered trust company may establish and maintain representative trust offices in any other state in accordance with the laws of the other state and with the prior approval of the director. A Nebraska state-chartered trust company may not act in a fiduciary capacity but may conduct any other trust company activities at any representative trust office outside the State of Nebraska that are permissible for a representative trust office of a trust company chartered by the host state where the representative trust office is located or for a national bank authorized to conduct a trust company business within the host state.

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 57.